public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-crx-build/vec.aff
FLAG UTF-8
# vèrbi -àr
# themeT1 + r/AahE
# vèrbi -àr inregolari ((dex)dar, (kon|kontra|[lƚ]ikue|putre|rare|re|sora|stra|stupe|tore|tume)far, (mal|move|soto)star)
# themeT1 + r/AhE
# themeT8 + o/hEJL
SFX h Y 165
SFX h ar à/F ar
SFX h ar àami/K ar
SFX h ar àau/Q ar
SFX h ar àelo/B ar
SFX h ar àeƚo/B ar
SFX h ar àemi/K ar
SFX h ar àimo/L ar
SFX h ar àimoi/M ar
SFX h ar àitu/O ar
SFX h ar àndome/G ar
SFX h ar àndomene/G ar
SFX h ar àomi/K ar
SFX h ar àrmene/G ar
SFX h ar àsimo ar
SFX h ar àvami/K ar
SFX h ar àvau/Q ar
SFX h ar àvelo/B ar
SFX h ar àveƚo/B ar
SFX h ar àvemi/K ar
SFX h ar àvimo/L ar
SFX h ar àvimoi/M ar
SFX h ar àvitu/O ar
SFX h ar àvomi/K ar
SFX h ar è/FP ar
SFX h ar ème/H ar
SFX h ar èu/Q ar
SFX h ar é/FP ar
SFX h ar éami/K ar
SFX h ar éau/Q ar
SFX h ar éelo/B ar
SFX h ar éeƚo/B ar
SFX h ar éemi/K ar
SFX h ar éimo/L ar
SFX h ar éimoi/M ar
SFX h ar éitu/O ar
SFX h ar émoi/M ar
SFX h ar émome/G ar
SFX h ar émomene/G ar
SFX h ar éomi/K ar
SFX h ar ésimo ar
SFX h ar évami/K ar
SFX h ar évau/Q ar
SFX h ar évelo/B ar
SFX h ar éveƚo/B ar
SFX h ar évemi/K ar
SFX h ar évimo/L ar
SFX h ar évimoi/M ar
SFX h ar évitu/O ar
SFX h ar évomi/K ar
SFX h ar ede/P ar
SFX h ar ege/P ar
SFX h ar emo/EL ar
SFX h ar en/L ar
SFX h ar endo/E ar
SFX h ar eni/M ar
SFX h ar ense ar
SFX h ar erà/FJLN ar
SFX h ar eràe/F ar
SFX h ar eràvelo/B ar
SFX h ar eràveƚo/B ar
SFX h ar eràvemi/K ar
SFX h ar erè/JL ar
SFX h ar erèmi/K ar
SFX h ar eré/P ar
SFX h ar erémoi/M ar
SFX h ar erémome/G ar
SFX h ar erémomene/G ar
SFX h ar erésimo/L ar
SFX h ar erésimoi/M ar
SFX h ar erésitu/O ar
SFX h ar eréu/Q ar
SFX h ar ería/FJLN ar
SFX h ar eríami/K ar
SFX h ar eríatu/O ar
SFX h ar eríe/FJL ar
SFX h ar eríelo/B ar
SFX h ar eríeƚo/B ar
SFX h ar eríemi/K ar
SFX h ar erísitu/O ar
SFX h ar erò/JL ar
SFX h ar eròmi/K ar
SFX h ar eralo/B ar
SFX h ar eraƚo/B ar
SFX h ar erami/K ar
SFX h ar eratu/O ar
SFX h ar erave/FS ar
SFX h ar eremo/EL ar
SFX h ar eren/L ar
SFX h ar ereni/M ar
SFX h ar erense ar
SFX h ar eresi/P ar
SFX h ar eresiu/Q ar
SFX h ar erié/P ar
SFX h ar eriéu/Q ar
SFX h ar erion/L ar
SFX h ar erioni/M ar
SFX h ar erionse ar
SFX h ar erisen/L ar
SFX h ar eriseni/M ar
SFX h ar erisense ar
SFX h ar erisié/P ar
SFX h ar erisiéu/Q ar
SFX h ar erisi/P ar
SFX h ar erision/L ar
SFX h ar erisioni/M ar
SFX h ar erisionse ar
SFX h ar erisiu/Q ar
SFX h ar erison/L ar
SFX h ar erisoni/M ar
SFX h ar erisonse ar
SFX h ar eron/L ar
SFX h ar eroni/M ar
SFX h ar eronse ar
SFX h ar ese/IT ar
SFX h ar esto/BI ar
SFX h ar eva/FJLP ar
SFX h ar eve/JL ar
SFX h ar evi/NP ar
SFX h ar evo/JL ar
SFX h ar ié/P ar
SFX h ar iéu/Q ar
SFX h ar iede/P ar
SFX h ar iege/P ar
SFX h ar ion/EL [^cijɉñ]ar
SFX h ar ioni/M [^cijɉñ]ar
SFX h ar ionme/G [^cijɉñ]ar
SFX h ar isen/L ar
SFX h ar iseni/M ar
SFX h ar isense ar
SFX h ar isié/P ar
SFX h ar isiede/P ar
SFX h ar isiege/P ar
SFX h ar ision/L ar
SFX h ar isione ar
SFX h ar isioni/M ar
SFX h ar isionse ar
SFX h ar ison/L ar
SFX h ar isoni/M ar
SFX h ar isonse ar
SFX h ar iven/L ar
SFX h ar iveni/M ar
SFX h ar ivense ar
SFX h ar ivié/P ar
SFX h ar iviéu/Q ar
SFX h ar ivion/L ar
SFX h ar ivioni/M ar
SFX h ar ivionse ar
SFX h ar ivon/L ar
SFX h ar ivoni/M ar
SFX h ar ivonse ar
SFX h ar on/EL ar
SFX h ar oni/M ar
SFX h ar onme/G ar
SFX h o a/EF o
SFX h o e/EFIJKL o
SFX h o elo/B o
SFX h o eƚo/B o
SFX h o emi/K o
SFX h o i/EFN o
SFX h o ime/H o
SFX h o itu/O o
SFX h o omi/K o
SFX h r do/B ar
SFX h r nte/I ar
SFX h r se/IT ar

# vèrbi -àr inregolari ((re)andar)
# themeT1 + r/AahiE
SFX i Y 33
SFX i ào aga vào
SFX i ào agi/FN vào
SFX i ào ago/JL vào
SFX i andar và/F andar
SFX i andar vè/FP andar
SFX i andar vè/JL andar
SFX i andar vème/H andar
SFX i andar vètu/O andar
SFX i andar vèu/Q andar
SFX i andar vé/FP andar
SFX i andar vé/P andar
SFX i andar vatu/O andar
SFX i andar vede/P andar
SFX i andar vege/P andar
SFX i andar vemo/EL andar
SFX i andar ven/L andar
SFX i andar vene andar
SFX i andar vetu/O andar
SFX i andar veu/Q andar
SFX i andar vion/EL andar
SFX i andar vioni/M andar
SFX i andar vionme/G andar
SFX i andar von/EL andar
SFX i andar vone andar
SFX i andar voni/M andar
SFX i andar vonme/G andar
SFX i ao àgomi/K vao
SFX i o a v[aà]o
SFX i o e/FIJL v[aà]o
SFX i o ga vao
SFX i o go/JLT vao
SFX i o gomi/K vào
SFX i o i v[aà]o
