public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-crx-build/vec.dic
alborar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
inamidar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
andar/AahiE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
vao/hiJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:andar
reandar/AahiE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
revào/hiJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:reandar
apaltar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
arko/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:arkar
dexativar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
'eo/biJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:'er
'veo/biJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:'ver
ao/biJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:aver st:aer
reào/biJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:reaver st:reaer
regào/biJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:regaver
axiar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
xbaiƚar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
xbalanŧar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
inbalsamar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
banketar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
barboto/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:barbotar
batedar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
dexbautar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
xbeketar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
bertono/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:bertonar
xbiankedar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
inkonbinar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
bixar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
inbòkoƚo/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:inbokoƚar
xbonbardar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
xboroŧar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
dexboŧar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
inbrageso/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:inbragesar
braŧolar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
xbrindolar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
xbroento/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:xbroentar
xbudèƚo/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:xbudeƚar
inbustar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
malcapar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
ciɉo/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:ciɉar
damasko/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:damaskar
darenar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
dixdisiar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
predomenar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
indotar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
đalido/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:đalidar
đeneralidar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
malđontar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
dular/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
elímino/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:eliminar
exàspero/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:exasperar
desfàbriko/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:desfabrikar
falŧidio/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:falŧidiar
fataliđar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
dolsifegar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
femenar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
fetar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
desfidar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
strafiƚo/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:strafiƚar
sfiorixo/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:sfiorixar
sfodarar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
foƚexar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
reformo/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:reformar
arfòso/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:arfosar
fraso/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:frasar
frego/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:fregar
frular/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
profumegar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
ingaɉo/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:ingaɉar
ingalono/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:ingalonar
xgaròfolo/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:xgarofolar
gorgexo/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:gorgexar
dexgraneƚar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
dexgravo/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:dexgravar
gruo/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:gruar
indatejo/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:indatejar
invenŧionar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
xjaveto/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:xjavetar
kàbalo/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:kabalar
kalmo/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:kalmar
kanonar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
inkapuso/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:inkapusar
skartexo/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:skartexar
prekaŧo/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:prekaŧar
kògoƚo/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:kogoƚar
kòmio/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:komiar
deskonso/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:deskonsar
kosar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
króo/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:kroar
inkuèro/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:inkuerar
kúŧolo/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:kuŧolar
tralasar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
ƚesko/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:ƚeskar
xlímego/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:xlimegar
ƚontano/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:ƚontanar
xmagonar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
manxo/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:manxar
dexmàskaro/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:dexmaskarar
stramexar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
xmarsiar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
mòlo/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:molar
mòsto/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:mostar
dexnamorar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
nolar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
ocedo/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:ocedar
dexórdeno/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:dexordenar
padronixar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
palpuñar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
pariđo/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:pariđar
rapatumar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
spelatar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
inperlar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
repeŧo/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:repeŧar
spierar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
pistoredar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
polveriđar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
aspòrto/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:asportar
sprèso/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:spresar
puñaƚo/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:puñaƚar
ranko/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:rankar
règono/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:regonar
inròdolo/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:inrodolar
rovino/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:rovinar
salario/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:salariar
scamo/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:scamar
insèƚo/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:inseƚar
disèsto/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:disestar
singolarixar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
skarsixo/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:skarsixar
skròfolo/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:skrofolar
resomeɉo/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:resomeɉar
prosperar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
spròno/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:spronar
stenógrafo/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:stenografar
straŧar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
susultar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
destano/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:destanar
tavèlo/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:tavelar
intarar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
toƚerar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
intovaɉo/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:intovaɉar
destregoƚar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
truskar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
sekoƚar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
deservèƚo/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:deserveƚar
inŧipriar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
uŧar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
xvedeƚar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
xverxèƚo/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:xverxeƚar
xvétoƚo/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:xvetoƚar
xvogaso/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:xvogasar
xbiaso/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:xbiasar
xñinfeđo/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:xñinfeđar
